Utah statutes.
57-8-13.10.   Condominiums containing convertible land -- Expandable
condominiums -- Allocation of interests in common areas and facilities.
(1)  If a condominium project contains any convertible land or is an
expandable condominium, then the declaration may not allocate undivided
interests in the common areas and facilities on the basis of par value unless
the declaration:
(a)  prohibits the creation of any units not substantially identical to the
units depicted on the condominium plat recorded pursuant to Subsection
57-8-13(1); or
(b)  prohibits the creation of any units not described under Subsection
57-8-10(3)(a)(vii) in the case of convertible land, Subsection
57-8-10(4)(a)(xi) in the case of additional land, and contains from the outset
a statement of the par value that shall be assigned to every unit that may be
created.
(2) (a)  Interests in the common areas and facilities  may not be allocated to
any units to be created within any convertible land or within any additional
land until a condominium plat depicting the same is recorded pursuant to
Subsection 57-8-13(2).
(b)  Simultaneously with the recording of the supplemental condominium plat
required under Subsection (2)(a), the declarant shall execute and record an
amendment to the declaration which reallocates undivided interests in the
common areas and facilities so that the units depicted on the supplemental
condominium plat shall be allocated undivided interests in the common areas
and facilities on the same basis as the units depicted on the condominium plat
that was recorded simultaneously with the declaration pursuant to Subsection
57-8-13(1).
(3)  If all of a convertible space is converted into common areas and
facilities, including limited common areas and facilities, then the undivided
interest in the common areas and facilities appertaining to the convertible
space shall afterward appertain to the remaining units and shall be allocated
among them in proportion to their undivided interests in the common areas and
facilities.  The principal officer of the unit owners' association or of the
management committee, or any other officer specified in the declaration, shall
immediately prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration
reflecting the reallocation of undivided interest produced by the conversion.
(4) (a)  If the expiration or termination of any lease of a leasehold
condominium causes a contraction of the condominium project which reduces the
number of units, or if the withdrawal of withdrawable land of a contractible
condominium causes a contraction of the condominium project which reduces the
number of units, the undivided interest in the common areas and facilities
appertaining to any units so withdrawn shall afterward appertain to the
remaining units, being allocated among them in proportion to their undivided
interests in the common areas and facilities.
(b)  The principal officer of the unit owners' association or of the
management committee, or any other officer specified in the declaration shall
immediately prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration,
reflecting the reallocation of undivided interests produced by the reduction
of units.
